Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202620-705
Act; applicability.

The First Freedom Act applies to all state and local laws, and the implementation of those laws, whether statutory or otherwise, regardless of whether adopted before or after July 19, 2024.

Laws 2024, LB43, § 5.